Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4091.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 396.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 396.005, as used in this section, “active service”
means:
(a) Service performed on full-time duty status under Title 10 of the United States Code.
(b) Service performed on full-time duty status under Title 32 of the United States Code
when performed under an authority other than the Governor.
(2) The Adjutant General may facilitate, assist or coordinate in the mobilization of a
service member or unit of the Oregon National Guard that is called into active service only
if, and except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the active service is for
one of the following reasons:
(a) In support of a congressionally authorized military contingency operation.
(b) In support of operations that are in response to a formally declared national catas-
trophe or disaster.
(c) In support of a congressionally authorized mission with the United States Department
of Homeland Security that is consistent with federal law on the appropriate use of the Armed
Forces of the United States within or without the continental United States.
(d) For training for duties that are part of the primary duties of the individual or unit.
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 192

HB 4091
(e) For military support of civil authorities for other duties authorized by Congress or
federal law.
(3) Neither the Governor, the Adjutant General nor any officer or employee of state
government, as defined in ORS 174.111, may facilitate, assist or coordinate in the
mobilization of a service member or unit of the Oregon National Guard that is called into
active service if the active service is for law enforcement duties or immigration enforcement
duties. For purposes of this subsection, “immigration enforcement duties” does not include
support, logistics or surveillance duties that are part of a border security operation.
(4) The Governor may not give consent for, nor may the Adjutant General allow, a ser-
vice member or unit of the Oregon National Guard to be mobilized into active service if the
mobilization of the service member or unit into active service results in the Oregon National
Guard being effectively incapable of responding to a statewide emergency, such as a natural
disaster or act of terrorism.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the Adjutant General or any officer or employee of
state government from carrying out federal or state laws relating to the rights and privileges
of service members of the Oregon National Guard.
SECTION 3. The militia or armed forces of another state, territory or district of the
United States may not enter the borders of this state for the purpose of performing military
duty within the borders of this state or perform military duty within the borders of this
state, unless:
(1) The Governor permits or authorizes the militia or armed forces to enter the borders
of this state or perform military duty within the borders of this state; or
(2) The militia or armed forces are serving in a federal active duty status under the au-
thority of the President of the United States.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[2]